Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2548HV (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 635 Section 1. Section 321J.9, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. The effective date of revocation shall be ten twenty days 3 after the department has mailed notice of revocation to the 4 person by first class mail, notwithstanding chapter 17A . The 5 peace officer who requested or directed the administration of a 6 chemical test may, on behalf of the department, serve immediate 7 notice of intention to revoke and of revocation on a person 8 who refuses to permit chemical testing. If the peace officer 9 serves immediate notice, the peace officer shall take the Iowa 10 license or permit of the driver, if any, and issue a temporary 11 license effective for ten twenty days. The peace officer shall 12 immediately send the personâs license to the department along 13 with the officerâs certificate indicating the personâs refusal 14 to submit to chemical testing. 15 Sec. 2. Section 321J.12, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2025, are 16 amended to read as follows: 17 3. The effective date of the revocation shall be ten twenty 18 days after the department has mailed notice of revocation to 19 the person by first class mail, notwithstanding chapter 17A . 20 The peace officer who requested or directed the administration 21 of the chemical test may, on behalf of the department, serve 22 immediate notice of revocation on a person whose test results 23 indicated the presence of a controlled substance or other drug, 24 or an alcohol concentration equal to or in excess of the level 25 prohibited by section 321J.2 , or a combination of alcohol and 26 another controlled substance or drug in violation of section 27 321J.2 . 28 4. If the peace officer serves that immediate notice, the 29 peace officer shall take the personâs Iowa license or permit, 30 if any, and issue a temporary license valid only for ten twenty 31 days. The peace officer shall immediately send the personâs 32 driverâs license to the department along with the officerâs 33 certificate indicating that the test results indicated the 34 presence of a controlled substance or other drug, or an alcohol 35 -1- LSB 2548HV (1) 91 th/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 635 concentration equal to or in excess of the level prohibited by 1 section 321J.2 . 2